Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 2. Town Fire Districts

§ 2541.
Formation.

At an annual or special meeting, by a majority vote of those present and voting, towns may vote to form a fire district whose limits shall be the town limits, provided the warning for such meeting contains an article to that effect.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 62

, § 2, eff. April 14, 1971.

§ 2542.
Powers generally.

A town functioning as a fire district under this chapter shall have all the powers, so far as the same may be applicable, now given to fire districts by sections 2601-2607 and 2671-2675 of this title.

§ 2543.
Board of fire commissioners.

When a town has so voted, the selectboard shall constitute a board of fire commissioners and may purchase all necessary and proper apparatus for the prevention and extinguishment of fires.

§ 2544.
Employees.

The selectboard may appoint a chief engineer for such district and all other necessary firefighters and employees.

§ 2545.
Expenditures.

All expenditures under sections 2541-2544 of this title shall be paid out of the general fund of the town unless the town by its vote shall otherwise direct.